California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(2) Those not-for-profit clinics and public hospitals seeking to contract with licensees for dental services.

(c) (1) The board shall review the impact of this section on the availability of dentists in California and report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature by January 1, 2008. The report shall include a separate section providing data
 specific to those dentists who intend to fulfill the alternative clinical practice requirements of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a). The report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) The total number of applicants from other states who have sought licensure.

(B) The number of dentists from other states licensed pursuant to this section, as well as the number of licenses not granted and the reasons why each license was not granted.

(C) The location of the practice of dentists licensed pursuant to this section.

(D) The number of dentists licensed pursuant to this section who establish a practice in a rural area or in an area designated as having a shortage of practicing dentists or no dentists at all.

(E) The length of time dentists licensed pursuant to this section maintained their practice in the reported location. This information shall be reported separately for dentists described in subparagraphs (C) and (D).

(2) In identifying a dentist’s location of practice, the board shall use medical service study areas or other appropriate geographic descriptions for regions of the state.

(3) If appropriate, the board may report the information required by paragraph (1) separately for primary care dentists and specialists.

(d) The board is authorized to contract with a third party or parties to review applications filed under this section and to advise the board as to whether the applications are complete. The contracting party, its agents, and its employees
 shall agree to be bound by all provisions of law applicable to the board, its members, and staff, governing custody and confidentiality of materials submitted by applicants for licensure.

(e) The board may issue a temporary, restricted license, valid for two years, to an applicant qualified under subparagraph (B) or (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), that authorizes the holder to practice dentistry only in the facilities described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) or only to practice or teach dentistry at the accredited dental education programs described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a). The board shall immediately revoke the temporary license issued pursuant to this subdivision upon a finding that the requirements of subparagraph (B) or (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), as applicable, have not been met. Upon revocation of the license, the board shall issue a notice of revocation that
 shall require the licensee to immediately cease dental practice. Upon the licensee’s completion of the license requirements under this section and the expiration of the two-year term, all location restrictions on the license shall be removed and an unrestricted license shall be issued.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a holder of a license issued by the board before January 1, 2006, under this section who committed to complete the remainder of the five years of clinical practice requirement by a contract either to practice dentistry in a facility described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) or to teach or practice dentistry in an accredited dental education program approved by the board pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) shall be required to complete only two years of service under the contract in order to fulfill the obligation under this section. Upon the expiration of that
 two-year term, all location restrictions on the license shall be removed and the holder is authorized to practice dentistry in accordance with this chapter in any allowable setting in the state.

(g) A license issued pursuant to this section shall be considered a valid, unrestricted license for purposes of Section 1972.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 9.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1635.7.

Any person licensed pursuant to Section 1635.5 shall be required to fulfill continuing education requirements established by the board pursuant to Section 1645 before his or her license is eligible to be renewed in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 464, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1636.4.

(a) The Legislature recognizes the need to ensure that graduates of foreign dental schools who have received an education that is equivalent to that of accredited institutions in the United States and that adequately prepares the students for the practice of dentistry shall be subject to the same licensure requirements as graduates of approved dental schools or colleges. It is the purpose of this section to provide for the evaluation of foreign dental schools and the approval of those foreign dental schools that provide an education that is equivalent to that of similar accredited institutions in the United States and that adequately prepare their students for the practice of dentistry.

(b) Beginning January 1, 2024, a school seeking approval as a foreign dental school shall be required to have successfully completed the international consultative and accreditation process with the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association or a comparable accrediting body approved by the board. Graduates of a foreign dental school whose programs were approved at the time of graduation shall be eligible for licensure pursuant to Section 1628.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 35) and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 865, Sec. 36.   (AB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1636.5.

Notwithstanding Section 1636.4, any foreign dental school whose program was renewed by the board prior to January 1, 2020, through any date between January 1, 2024, and June 30, 2026, shall maintain approval through that date. Upon expiration of the approval, the foreign dental school shall be required to comply with the provisions of Section 1636.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 367, Sec. 3.   (SB 607)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1636.6.

Notwithstanding Section 1636.4, graduates of a foreign dental school whose program was approved by the board prior to January 1, 2020, through any date before January 1, 2024, and who enrolled in the program prior to January 1, 2020, shall be eligible for licensure pursuant to Section 1628.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 367, Sec. 4.   (SB 607)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.4. Oral and Maxillofacial Surgery [1638. - 1638.7.]

1638.

(a) For purposes of this article, “oral and maxillofacial surgery” means the diagnosis and surgical and adjunctive treatment of diseases, injuries, and defects which involve both functional and esthetic aspects of the hard and soft tissues of the oral and maxillofacial region.

(b) Any person licensed under the Medical Practice Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000)) as a physician and surgeon who possesses, or possessed, a license to practice dentistry in another state, but is not licensed to practice dentistry under this chapter may apply to the board on a form prescribed by the board for an oral and maxillofacial surgery permit.

(c) The board may issue an oral and maxillofacial surgery permit to an applicant who has furnished evidence satisfactory to the board that he or she is currently certified or eligible for certification in oral and maxillofacial surgery by a specialty board recognized by the Commission on Accreditation of the American Dental Association and holds a current license in good standing to practice medicine in the state.

(d) An application shall be accompanied by an application fee required by the board and two classifiable sets of fingerprints on forms provided by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 510, Sec. 7.   (AB 179)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1638.1.

(a) A dentist shall possess a current license in good standing and an elective facial cosmetic surgery permit to perform elective facial cosmetic surgical procedures authorized by this section.

(b) The board may issue an elective facial cosmetic surgery permit to perform one of the following categories of elective facial cosmetic surgical procedures:

(1) Cosmetic contouring of the osteocartilaginous facial structure, which may include, but is not limited to, rhinoplasty and otoplasty.

(2) Cosmetic contouring or rejuvenation of the facial soft tissue, which may include, but is not limited to, facelift, blepharoplasty, facial skin
 resurfacing, or lip augmentation.

(3) Procedures under both paragraphs (1) and (2). 

(c) A licensee who desires to perform elective facial cosmetic surgery shall apply to the board on an application form prescribed by the board and submit all of the following:

(1) Proof of successful completion of an oral and maxillofacial surgery residency program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association.

(2) Proof that the licensee has satisfied all of the criteria specified in either subparagraph (A) or (B):

(A) (i) The licensee is certified, or is a candidate for certification, by the American Board of Oral and Maxillofacial
 Surgery.

(ii) A letter from the program director of the accredited residency program, or from the director of a postresidency fellowship program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association, stating that the licensee has the education, training, and competence necessary to perform the surgical procedures set forth in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (b) that the licensee has notified the board the licensee intends to perform.

(iii) Documentation of at least 10 operative reports from residency training or proctored surgical procedures performed at minimum in the role of surgical first assistant within five years from the date of application for each category of permit set forth in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) for which the licensee seeks a permit. If the licensee seeks a permit set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision
 (b), the licensee shall submit 10 operative reports for each category specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b). Each operative report shall indicate all of the following:

(I) Name of the licensee.

(II) Category of procedure and specific type of procedure performed.

(III) Date of the procedure.

(IV) The role in which the licensee participated in the procedure.

(iv) Documentation showing the surgical privileges the licensee possesses at any licensed general acute care hospital and any licensed outpatient surgical facility in this state.

(B) (i) The licensee has been granted privileges by the
 medical staff at a licensed general acute care hospital to perform the surgical procedures set forth in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (b) at that hospital.

(ii) Documentation described in clause (iii) of subparagraph (A).

(3) Proof that the licensee is on active status on the staff of a general acute care hospital and maintains the necessary privileges based on the bylaws of the hospital to maintain that status.

(d) The application shall be accompanied by an application fee required by the board for an initial permit. The fee to renew a permit shall not exceed the maximum amount prescribed in Section 1724.

(e) (1) The board shall appoint a credentialing committee to review the qualifications of each applicant for
 a permit. Upon completion of the review of an applicant, the committee shall make a recommendation to the board on whether to issue or not issue a permit to the applicant. The permit may be unqualified, entitling the permitholder to perform any facial cosmetic surgical procedure authorized by this section, or it may contain limitations if the credentialing committee is not satisfied that the applicant has the training or competence to perform certain classes of procedures, or if the applicant has not requested to be permitted for all procedures authorized by this section.

(2) The credentialing committee shall be comprised of five members, as follows:

(A) A physician and surgeon with a specialty in plastic and reconstructive surgery who maintains active
 status on the staff of a licensed general acute care hospital in this state.

(B) A physician and surgeon with a specialty in otolaryngology who maintains active status on the staff of a licensed general acute care hospital in this state.

(C) Three oral and maxillofacial surgeons licensed by the board who are board certified by the American Board of Oral and Maxillofacial Surgeons, and who maintain active status on the staff of a licensed general acute care hospital in this state, at least one of whom shall be licensed as a physician and surgeon in this state. Two years after the effective date of this section, any oral and maxillofacial surgeon appointed to the committee who is not licensed as a physician and surgeon shall hold a permit pursuant to this
 section.

(3) The board shall solicit from the following organizations input and recommendations regarding members to be appointed to the credentialing committee:

(A) The Medical Board of California.

(B) The California Dental Association.

(C) The California Association of Oral and Maxillofacial Surgeons.

(D) The California Medical Association.

(E) The California Society of Plastic Surgeons.

(F) Any other source that the board deems appropriate.

(4) The credentialing committee shall meet at a time and place directed by the board to evaluate applicants for permits. A quorum of three members shall be required for the committee to consider applicants and make recommendations to the board. 

(f) The board may adopt regulations for the issuance of the permit that it deems necessary to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the public. 

(g) A
 licensee may not perform any elective, facial cosmetic surgical procedure except at a general acute care hospital, a licensed outpatient surgical facility, or an outpatient surgical facility accredited by the Joint Commission, the Accreditation Association for Ambulatory Health Care (AAAHC), the Medicare Program, or an accreditation agency approved by the Medical Board of California pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 1248.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(h) For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(1) “Elective cosmetic surgery” means any procedure defined as cosmetic surgery in subdivision (d) of Section 1367.63 of the Health and Safety Code, and excludes any procedure that constitutes reconstructive surgery, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1367.63 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Facial” means those regions of the human body described in Section 1625 and in any regulations adopted pursuant to that section by the board.

(i) A holder of a permit issued pursuant to this section shall not perform elective facial cosmetic surgical procedures unless the permitholder has malpractice insurance or other financial security protection that would satisfy the requirements of Section 2216.2 and any regulations adopted thereunder.

(j) A holder of a permit shall comply with the requirements of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1248.15 of the Health and Safety Code, and the reporting requirements specified in Section 2240, with respect to any surgical procedure authorized by this section, in the same manner as a physician and surgeon.

(k) Any violation of this section constitutes unprofessional conduct and is grounds for the revocation or suspension of the person’s permit, license, or both, or the person may be reprimanded or placed on probation. Proceedings initiated by the board under this section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all the powers granted therein.

(l) A permit issued pursuant to this section shall be valid for a period of two years and must be renewed by the permitholder at the time the dentist license is renewed.

(m) A permitholder shall be required to complete 24 hours of approved courses of study related to elective cosmetic surgery as a condition of renewal of a permit. Those courses of study shall
 be credited toward the total continuing education hours required by the board pursuant to Section 1645.

(n) Permits issued prior to January 1, 2025, that limit the type of procedure under the general permit category provided under paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) authorized to be performed by the permitholder shall not be renewed. This subdivision shall not apply to a permit that authorized the permitholder to practice any procedure under the general permit category specified under paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b). The permitholder who seeks to continue performing the procedure previously limited by the permit shall submit an application to the board for issuance of a new permit under paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (b) and the board may request the permitholder to submit additional documentation demonstrating the permitholder’s competency for issuance of such permit. The application shall be treated as a renewal
 application for purposes of subdivision (m) of Section 1724. 

(o) On or before January 1, 2025, and every four years thereafter, the board shall report to the appropriate committees of the Legislature on all of the following:

(1) The number of persons licensed pursuant to Section 1634 who apply to receive a permit to perform elective facial cosmetic surgery from the board pursuant to this section.

(2) The number of persons receiving a permit from the board to perform elective facial cosmetic surgery.

(3) The number of complaints filed by or on behalf of patients who have received elective facial cosmetic surgery by persons who have received a permit from the board to perform elective facial cosmetic surgery.

(4) Action taken by the board resulting from complaints filed by or on behalf of patients who have received elective facial cosmetic surgery by persons who have received a permit from the board to perform elective facial cosmetic surgery.

(p) As used in this section, “good standing” means the license is active and unrestricted by disciplinary action taken pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, is not the subject of an unresolved complaint or review procedure, and is not the subject of any unresolved disciplinary proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 10.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1638.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person licensed pursuant to Section 1634 who holds a permit to perform elective facial cosmetic surgery issued pursuant to this article may not perform elective facial cosmetic surgery on a patient, unless the patient has received, within 30 days prior to the elective facial cosmetic surgery procedure, and confirmed as up-to-date on the day of the procedure, an appropriate physical examination by, and written clearance for the procedure from, either of the following:

(1) A licensed physician and surgeon.

(2) A person licensed pursuant to Section 1634 who holds a permit to perform elective
 facial cosmetic surgery issued pursuant to this article.

(b) The physical examination described in subdivision (a) shall include the taking of an appropriate medical history.

(c) An appropriate medical history and physical examination done on the day of the procedure shall be presumed to be in compliance with subdivisions (a) and (b).

(d) A violation of this section shall not constitute a crime.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 509, Sec. 2.   (AB 1116)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1638.3.

(a) The fee to renew an oral and maxillofacial surgery permit shall be the amount prescribed in Section 1724.

(b) Every provision of this chapter applicable to a person licensed to practice dentistry shall apply to a person to whom a special permit is issued under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 510, Sec. 9.   (AB 179)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1638.5.

An oral and maxillofacial surgery permit shall be automatically suspended for any period of time during which the holder does not possess a current valid license to practice medicine in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 629, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1638.7.

The next occupational analysis of dental licensees and oral and maxillofacial facial surgeons pursuant to Section 139 shall include a survey of the training and practices of oral and maxillofacial surgeons and, upon completion of that analysis, a report shall be made to the Joint Committee on Boards, Commissions, and Consumer Protection regarding the findings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 33, Sec. 18.   Effective April 13, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Special Permits [1640. - 1642.]

1640.

Any person meeting all the following eligibility requirements may apply for a special permit:

(a) Furnishing satisfactory evidence of having a pending contract with a California dental college approved by the board as a full-time professor, an associate professor, or an assistant professor.

(b) Furnishing satisfactory evidence of having graduated from a dental college approved by the board, or of having completed an advanced education program accredited by either the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association or a national accrediting body approved by the board.

(c) Furnishing satisfactory evidence of having been certified as a diplomate of a specialty board or, in lieu thereof, establishing his or her qualifications to take a specialty board examination or furnishing satisfactory evidence of having completed an advanced educational program in a discipline from a dental college approved by the board.

(d) Furnishing satisfactory evidence of successfully completing an examination in California law and ethics developed and administered by the board.

(e) Paying a fee for applications as provided by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 799, Sec. 2.   (SB 1575)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1640.1.

As used in this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Specialty” means an area of dental practice approved by the American Dental Association and recognized by the board.

(b) “Discipline” means an advanced dental educational program in an area of dental practice not approved as a specialty by the American Dental Association; but offered from a dental college approved by the board.

(c) “Dental college approved by the board” means a dental school or college that is approved by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association, that is
 accredited by a body that has a reciprocal accreditation agreement with that commission, or that has been approved by the Dental Board of California through its own approval process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 426, Sec. 8.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1640.2.

(a) The board shall limit the number of special permits to practice in a discipline at a college to the number that may be properly administered and supervised by the board.

(b) The board shall allow a person who has held a special permit for at least the seven preceding years to enter into a part-time contract with a California dental college approved by the board, provided that the person notifies the board of this change and provides the board with a pending employment contract for part-time employment with a California dental college approved by the board.

(c) A holder of a special permit shall practice no more than one day per week in the school’s faculty practice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 534, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1640.3.

The board may issue a special permit to a dentist who does not meet the eligibility requirements pursuant to Section 1640 if he or she provides evidence of compliance with the following requirements to the board:

(a) A dentist shall satisfy either of the following conditions:

(1) The dentist’s expertise or skill is in a specialty area of dental practice approved by the American Dental Association and recognized by the board, and the board has received verification, in writing, from the dean of the dental school where a contract is pending, that the addition of this dentist to the faculty will benefit the students and the dental program.

(2) Verification, in writing, from the dean of the dental school where a contract is pending, that the addition of this general dentist to the faculty will benefit the students and the dental program.

(b) A complete transcript of academic and clinical dental school records of the applicant is provided to the board.

(c) A legible, true copy of the dental diploma or dental degree conferred upon the applicant is provided to the board.

(d) A copy of the applicant’s valid dental license is provided to the board.

(e) Satisfactory evidence of possessing a pending contract with a California dental college approved by the board as a full-time professor, associate professor, or as an assistant professor.

(f) Satisfactory evidence that the applicant’s credentials were presented to the school’s faculty credentialing committee or similar faculty review committee and the dean of the dental school provides written acknowledgment that the applicant is an essential addition to the school’s faculty and strongly recommends to the dean that the applicant be offered an employment contract.

(g) The number of special permits issued by the board under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) is no more than five permits per dental school. The number of special permits issued by the board under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) is no more than five permits per dental school.

(h) The board is furnished with satisfactory evidence that the applicant has successfully completed an examination in California law and ethics developed and administered by the board.

(i) A fee for the application is paid as provided by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 534, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1642.

Every person to whom a special permit is issued shall be entitled to practice in their recognized specialty or discipline at the dental college at which he or she is employed and its affiliated institutions as approved by the board on the following terms and conditions:

(a) The special permitholder shall file a copy of his or her employment contract with the board. The contract shall contain the following provision:

That the holder understands and acknowledges that when his or her full-time or part-time employment is terminated at the dental college, his or her special permit will be automatically revoked and that he or she will voluntarily surrender the permit to the board and will no longer be eligible to practice unless or until he or she has successfully passed the required licensure examination as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 1625).

(b) The holder shall be employed as a full-time or part-time professor, an associate professor, or as an assistant professor at a California dental college approved by the board. “Full-time employment” as used in this section means a minimum of four days per week. “Part-time employment” as used in this section, means a maximum of three days a week.

(c) The holder shall be subject to all the provisions of this chapter applicable to licensed dentists with the exception that the special permit shall be renewed annually.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 534, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.6. Continuing Education [1645. - 1645.2.]

1645.

(a) (1) All holders of licenses under this chapter shall continue their education after receiving a license as a condition to the renewal thereof, and shall obtain evidence satisfactory to the board that they have, during the preceding two-year period, obtained continuing education relevant to developments in the practice of dentistry and dental assisting consistent with regulations established by the board.

(2) The board shall adopt regulations providing for the suspension of the licenses at the end of the two-year period until compliance with this section is accomplished.

(b) The board may also, as a condition of license renewal, require licensees to successfully complete a
 portion of the required continuing education hours in specific areas adopted in regulations by the board. The board may prescribe this mandatory coursework within the general areas of patient care, health and safety, law and ethics, and the risks of addiction associated with the use of Schedule II drugs. The mandatory coursework prescribed by the board shall not exceed 15 hours per renewal period for dentists, and 7.5 hours per renewal period for dental auxiliaries. Any mandatory coursework required by the board shall be credited toward the continuing education requirements established by the board pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) For a retired dentist who provides only uncompensated care, the board shall not require more than 60 percent of the hours of continuing education that are required of other licensed dentists. Notwithstanding subdivision (b), all of the hours of continuing education as described in this subdivision shall be gained
 through courses related to the actual delivery of dental services to the patient or the community, as determined by the board. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to reduce any requirements imposed by the board pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) Satisfactory completion of courses in the following subjects shall count as continuing education in courses in the actual delivery of dental services to the patient or the community:

(1) Licensee mental health and wellness and its impact on the delivery of dental services.

(2) Diversity, equity, and inclusion and its impact on the delivery of dental services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 11.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1645.1.

(a) A person who applies for licensure as a registered dental assistant shall provide evidence of having successfully completed board-approved courses in infection control, the Dental Practice Act, basic life support, radiation safety and coronal polishing. The length and content of the courses shall be governed by applicable board regulations. Failure to comply with this section shall result in automatic suspension of the license, which shall be reinstated upon the receipt of evidence that the licensee has successfully completed the required courses. Completion of the courses may be counted toward fulfillment of the continuing education requirements governed by Section 1645.

(b) The holder of an inactive registered dental assistant license is only required to comply with subdivision (a) as a condition of returning the holder’s license to active status.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 865, Sec. 39.   (AB 1519)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1645.2.

Any vaccine training program provided through the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention or the California Pharmacists Association, including courses that were completed by a licensed dentist or a registered dental hygienist on or after January 4, 2021, pursuant to the Department of Consumer Affairs public health emergency order DCA-20-104, DCA-21-111, DCA-21-113, or any subsequent waivers that supersede these waivers, and Section 1625.6 shall count toward the fulfillment of the continuing education requirements governed by Sections 1645 and 1936.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 653, Sec. 3.   (AB 526)   Effective October 8, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.7. Licensed Dentists from Mexico Pilot Program [1645.4. - 1645.4.]

1645.4.

(a) For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Board” means the Dental Board of California.

(2) “Program” means the Licensed Dentists from Mexico Pilot Program.

(b) The Licensed Dentists from Mexico Pilot Program is hereby created.

(c) (1) This program continues the dentist component of the Licensed Physicians and Dentists Pilot Program, as established in former Section 853, which authorized no more than 30 dentists from Mexico to
 practice dentistry in California for a period not to exceed three years.

(2) The program shall also maintain an alternate list of program participants.

(d) The board shall issue a three-year nonrenewable permit to practice dentistry to each dentist from Mexico who meets the criteria set forth in this section.

(e) (1) Each dentist from Mexico who is eligible to participate in this program shall comply with the requirements specified in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, or the requirements contained in paragraph (2):

(A) Be a graduate from the National Autonomous University of Mexico School of Faculty Dentistry (Facultad de
 Odontología).

(B) Meet all criteria required for licensure in Mexico that is required and being applied by the National Autonomous University of Mexico School of Faculty Dentistry (Facultad de Odontología), including, but not limited to:

(i) A minimum grade point average.

(ii) A specified English language comprehension and conversational level.

(iii) Passage of a general examination.

(iv) Passage of an oral interview.

(C) Enroll and complete an orientation program that focuses on the following:

(i) Practical issues in pharmacology that shall be taught by an instructor who is affiliated with a California dental school approved by the board.

(ii) Practical issues and diagnosis in oral pathology that shall be taught by an instructor who is affiliated with a California dental school approved by the board.

(iii) Clinical applications that shall be taught by an instructor who is affiliated with a California dental school approved by the board.

(iv) Biomedical sciences that shall be taught by an instructor who is affiliated with a California dental school approved by the board.

(v) Clinical history management that shall be taught by an instructor
 who is affiliated with a California dental school approved by the board.

(vi) Special patient care that shall be taught by an instructor who is affiliated with a California dental school approved by the board.

(vii) Sedation techniques that shall be taught by an instructor who is affiliated with a California dental school approved by the board.

(viii) Infection control guidelines that shall be taught by an instructor who is affiliated with a California dental school approved by the board.

(ix) Introduction to health care systems in California.

(x) Introduction to community clinic operations.

(2) (A) Graduate within the three-year period before enrollment in the program, from a foreign dental school that has received provisional approval or certification by November 2003 from the board under the Foreign Dental School Approval Program.

(B) Enroll and satisfactorily complete an orientation program that focuses on the health care system and community clinic operations in California.

(C) Enroll and satisfactorily complete a course taught by an approved foreign dental school on infection control approved by the board.

(3) Upon satisfactory completion to a competency level of the requirements in paragraph (1) or (2), each dentist
 participating in the program shall be eligible to obtain employment in a nonprofit community health center pursuant to subdivision (f) within the structure of an extramural dental program for a period not to exceed three years.

(4) Dentists participating in the program shall be required to complete the necessary continuing education units required by this chapter.

(5) The program shall accept 30 participating dentists. The program shall also maintain an alternate list of program applicants. If an active program participant leaves the program for any reason, a participating dentist from the alternate list shall be chosen to fill the vacancy. Only active program participants shall be required to complete the orientation program specified in subparagraph (C) of paragraph
 (1).

(6) (A) Additionally, an extramural dental facility may be identified, qualified, and approved by the board as an adjunct to, and an extension of, the clinical and laboratory departments of an approved dental school.

(B) As used in this subdivision, “extramural dental facility” includes, but is not limited to, any clinical facility linked to an approved dental school for the purposes of monitoring or overseeing the work of a dentist licensed in Mexico participating in this program and that is employed by an approved dental school for instruction in dentistry that exists outside or beyond the walls, boundaries, or precincts of the primary campus of the approved dental school, and in which dental services are rendered. These facilities shall include
 nonprofit community health centers.

(C) Dental services provided to the public in these facilities shall constitute a part of the dental education program.

(D) Approved dental schools shall register extramural dental facilities with the board. This registration shall be accompanied by information supplied by the dental school pertaining to faculty supervision, scope of treatment to be rendered, arrangements for postoperative care, the name and location of the facility, the date operations shall commence at the facility, and a description of the equipment and facilities available. This information shall be supplemented with a copy of the agreement between the approved dental school and the affiliated institution establishing the contractual relationship. Any change in the information
 initially provided to the board shall be communicated to the board.

(7) The program shall also include issues dealing with program operations, and shall be developed in consultation with representatives of community clinics, approved dental schools, or the National Autonomous University of Mexico School of Faculty Dentistry (Facultad de Odontología).

(8) The board shall provide oversight review of the implementation of this program and the evaluation required pursuant to subdivision (j). The board shall consult with dental schools in California that have applied for funding to implement and evaluate this program and executive and dental directors of nonprofit community health centers wanting to employ program participants, as it conducts its oversight responsibilities of this program